Maine, session 132, LD984.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1755 is enacted to read:
§1755. Automated external defibrillators
The Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of General Services
shall ensure that each state building is equipped with at least one automated external
defibrillator. As used in this section, "automated external defibrillator" has the same
meaning as in Title 22, section 2150-C, subsection 1, paragraph A.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §2007 is enacted to read:
§2007. Automated external defibrillators
A municipality shall ensure that each municipal building is equipped with at least one
automated external defibrillator. As used in this section, "automated external defibrillator"
has the same meaning as in Title 22, section 2150-C, subsection 1, paragraph A.